Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2227
Credentials; application; requirements.

(1) Applications for initial credentials, upgrade of credentials, credentials through reciprocity, temporary credentials, and renewal of credentials, including authorization to take the appropriate examination, shall be made in writing to the board on forms approved by the board. The payment of the appropriate fee in an amount established by the board pursuant to section 76-2241 shall accompany all applications.

(2) Applications for credentials shall include the applicant's social security number and such other information as the board may require.

(3) At the time of filing an application for a credential, the applicant shall sign a pledge that he or she has read and will comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice. Each applicant shall also certify that he or she understands the types of misconduct for which disciplinary proceedings may be initiated.

(4) To qualify for an initial credential, an upgrade of a credential, a credential through reciprocity, a temporary credential, or a renewal of a credential, an applicant shall:

(a) Certify that disciplinary proceedings are not pending against him or her in any jurisdiction or state the nature of any pending disciplinary proceedings;

(b) Certify that he or she has not surrendered an appraiser credential, or any other registration, license, or certification, issued by any other regulatory agency or held in any other jurisdiction, in lieu of disciplinary action pending or threatened within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of application;

(c) Certify that his or her appraiser credential, or any other registration, license, or certification, issued by any other regulatory agency or held in any other jurisdiction, has not been revoked or suspended within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of application;

(d) Not have been convicted of, including a conviction based upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere:

(i) Any felony or, if so convicted, has had his or her civil rights restored;

(ii) Any crime of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, money laundering, misrepresentation, or deceit involving real estate, financial services, or in the making of an appraisal within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of application; or

(iii) Any other crime which is related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a real property appraiser within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of application;

(e) Certify that no civil judicial actions, including dismissal with settlement, in connection with real estate, financial services, or in the making of an appraisal have been brought against him or her within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of application;

(f) Demonstrate character and general fitness such as to command the confidence and trust of the public; and

(g) Not possess a background that would call into question public trust or a credential holder's fitness for credentialing.

(5) Credentials shall be issued only to persons who have a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness, integrity, and competence to perform real property appraisal practice assignments in such manner as to safeguard the interest of the public and only after satisfactory proof of such qualification has been presented to the board upon request and a completed application has been approved.

(6) No credential shall be issued to a person other than an individual.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 27;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 490;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 23;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 18;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 47;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 10;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 14;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 44;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 29;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 72.